Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,105
Health maintenance organization, defined.

Health maintenance organization shall mean any person who undertakes to provide or arrange for the delivery of basic health care services to enrollees on a prepaid basis except for enrollee responsibility for copayments or deductibles.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 14.